Hawaii statutes.
[§467-4.5] Continuing education. (a)
The commission shall have the authority to:

(1) Set content and other requirements for continuing
education courses, providers, and instructors;

(2) Determine whether requirements have been met;

(3) Specify a mandatory core course, courses, or
equivalencies for a licensing biennium;

(4) Determine how many hours of a continuing
education course will be credited toward continuing education requirements for
real estate licensees;

(5) Develop its own continuing education courses or
approve courses developed by others; and

(6) Authorize the provision of courses taught by
alternative delivery methods with interactive instructional techniques.
Interactive instructional techniques may include but are not limited to:

(A) The opportunity for immediate exchange
with an instructor; and

(B) Assessment and remediation through the
assistance of computer, electronic, audio, or audiovisual interactive
instruction designed to internally measure and evaluate whether students have
mastered stated learning objectives.

(b) Continuing education providers shall:

(1) Certify that instructors have met the commission
requirements;

(2) Ensure that instructors are competent in the
subject matter of the course and are current in their knowledge of the subject
matter; and

(3) Ensure that the course is based on current
information, laws, and rules.

(c) Continuing education instructors shall
ensure that their courses are based on current information, laws, and rules.

(d) Continuing education courses shall be
designed to improve a licensee's competency, or professional standards and
practice and shall:

(1) Be offered by a provider approved by the
commission and either be:

(A) Approved by the commission and delivered
by an instructor certified by a commission-approved continuing education
provider;

(B) A national course delivered by an
instructor certified by the National Association of Realtors or its affiliates;

(C) A national course delivered by an
instructor certified by the Building Owners and Managers Association, the
Community Associations Institute, or any other national organization approved
by the commission; or

(D) Certified by the Association of Real
Estate License Law Officials;

(2) Be designed to allow students to exceed minimal
entry level competency in the subject matter of the course including consumer
protection in real estate transactions; and

(3) Not require an examination. [L 1999, c 47, pt of
§2 as superseded by c 240, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next